Illinois, session 104th, HB4527.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Election Code is amended by adding Section 51A-70 as follows: 6    (10 ILCS 5/1A-70 new)7    Sec. 1A-70. Data standardization.8    (a) To streamline the reporting of election results and 9voter file data, the State Board of Elections shall adopt 10rules setting forth standardized reporting protocols for 11election data. The rules shall provide for relevant election 12data points to have a standard identification, a 13human-readable name, or both. The rules shall include, but not 14be limited to:15        (1) standardization conventions for data fields 16    related to election districts, precincts, polling places, 17    and other election data; and18        (2) any other requirement that, in the discretion of 19    the State Board of Elections, facilitates efficient 20    interfacing with the statewide voter registration list 21    maintained under Section 1A-25 or the reporting and 22    dissemination of election data as required by law.23    (b) No later than July 1, 2027, the State Board of   HB4527- 2 -LRB104 16961 SPS 30375 b1Elections shall publish guidelines for compliance with 2standardization conventions for data fields related to 3election districts, precincts, polling places, and other 4election data.5    (c) Each election authority shall use the standardized 6reporting conventions and protocols adopted under this 7Section.8    (d) No later than October 1, 2027 and October 1 of each 9odd-numbered year thereafter, the staff of the State Board of 10Elections shall complete an audit of the data subject to the 11standardized reporting protocols adopted under this Section 12and shall verify that the data submissions conform to the 13standardization requirements. The staff of the State Board of 14Elections, as part of the audit conducted under this 15subsection, shall advise the election authority of any needed 16corrections to the content, formatting, or mode of submission 17of the data as soon as practicable.18    (e) Beginning with the 2028 general primary election, no 19less than 75 days before each election, every election 20authority shall ensure that all data reported by the election 21authority that is related to election districts, election 22precincts, and polling places and is otherwise identified 23under paragraph (2) of subsection (a) conforms to the 24guidelines published under subsection (b).25    (f) If the data standardization requirements of this 26Section regulating the formatting of data related to election   HB4527- 3 -LRB104 16961 SPS 30375 b1districts, precincts, and polling places conflict with any 2specific provision of this Code, the requirements of this 3Section prevail.